Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-114
Jails; administrative visitation.

The sheriff or such other person as may be charged with the administrative direction of the jail shall visit the jail in person and examine into the condition of each prisoner at least once in each month, and once during each term of the district court.

R.S.1866, c. 29, § 12, p. 246;

R.S.1913, § 3540;

C.S.1922, § 3007;

C.S.1929, § 47-112;

R.S.1943, § 47-114;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 18.